src/fst/stems/determiners.lexc
LEXICON dettag
+Det: # ;

LEXICON Determiners
sav  dettag " another (sg)" ;
savosav  dettag " other (non sg)" ;
tetāi  dettag " any; koa(n), some" ;
tei  dettag " some of it/them" ;
haulu  dettag " many/much" ;
musav  dettag " many/much (archaic)" ;
koa dettag "this" ;

ka dettag "
